Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,113
Local housing agency; powers enumerated.

In addition to any other express, constructive, or implied powers existing under applicable law, a local housing agency shall have the following powers, which may be exercised singly or in any combination, the enumeration of which shall not be construed to limit the powers of any local housing agency to the powers so enumerated:

(1) To have perpetual existence unless terminated by proper authority as provided by law;

(2) To sue and, subject to the limitations, privileges, and immunities provided by applicable law, be sued;

(3) To adopt a seal and to alter such seal from time to time;

(4) To adopt, amend, repeal, and restate bylaws;

(5) To adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations related to carrying out the purposes of the local housing agency and exercising its powers and to amend or repeal such rules and regulations from time to time;

(6) To enter into, execute, and perform contracts, instruments, and agreements of every kind and description within or without its area of operation except where otherwise expressly provided in furtherance of the purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act and in connection with the exercise of any of its powers;

(7) To issue bonds and other debt instruments as provided in sections 71-15,114 to 71-15,121 and to secure the repayment of such bonds and debt instruments as provided in subdivision (24) of this section;

(8) Subject to the limitations elsewhere provided in the act, to guarantee any indebtedness or performance of any controlled affiliates or other public bodies of this state. The housing agency shall not guarantee the indebtedness or performance of any other party, except that the housing agency may create a special limited fund for the purposes provided in section 71-15,131;

(9) To enter into and perform interagency and intergovernmental agreements of every kind and description; and to act in consortium with, as agent or manager for, or pursuant to agreement or contract with other local housing agencies and any and all state, federal, and local public agencies to carry out the purposes of the act and to exercise any of its powers;

(10) To form and operate nonprofit corporations and other affiliates of every kind and description, which may be wholly or partially owned or controlled, for carrying out the purposes of the act and in connection with the exercise of any of the powers of a local housing agency;

(11) To enter into agreements of every kind and description in furtherance of the purposes of the act and in connection with the exercise of any of the powers of a local housing agency. Consistent with the limitations upon their powers set forth in sections 71-15,122 to 71-15,129, local housing agencies may participate in agreements with persons and for-profit entities whose purpose is solely that of pecuniary gain, as well as with nonprofit entities and persons who seek no pecuniary gain. The participation of a local housing agency in any arrangement with other persons or entities, including for-profit persons and entities, shall not cause any activity engaged in by the agency to be characterized as proprietary nor deprive the agency of any privilege or immunity otherwise existing under law;

(12) Pursuant to approval of the local housing agency's board of commissioners, acting through one or more of its commissioners or other designees, to conduct examinations and investigations with respect to any matter relating to the purposes of the act and to make available to public agencies and officials and the public all findings, conclusions, and recommendations resulting from such examinations and investigations; to subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, books, records, papers, electronic and other data, and things; to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are outside this state, are unable to attend a hearing, or are excused from such attendance and to issue commissions for the examination of documents, books, records, papers, electronic and other data, and things outside this state; and to administer oaths and receive sworn or unsworn testimony or other proofs at public or nonpublic hearings;

(13) To invest or cause to be invested any funds held as reserves or sinking funds and any sums not required for immediate disbursement in connection with the operations of the agency, its developments, and its programs in property or securities in any manner allowable by law with respect to funds of this state or any public agency of this state, except that if any funds are pledged as security for a debt and the debt or security instrument specifies the permitted investments, such debt or security instrument provision shall control the permitted investments of such funds; to cooperate with this state or any public agency of this state with respect to investing the housing agency's funds; to enter into agreements and contracts with respect to the investment of its funds upon such terms and conditions as the agency deems reasonable and appropriate; and to purchase the agency's own bonds or other securities at such price as the agency shall in its discretion determine to be acceptable, except that no funds of an agency shall be placed in investments which the agency believes at the time of investment are highly speculative or involve a high degree of foreseeable risk;

(14) To conduct studies, assessments, and analyses of living conditions and affordable housing and community development and redevelopment needs and the means and methods through which unsatisfactory living conditions may be improved and affordable housing and community development and redevelopment needs may be met; to participate in the planning processes conducted by units of local government having jurisdiction over the agency's area of operation and to make recommendations with respect to the provision of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations to persons of eligible income and the improvement of the social and economic conditions affecting such persons; to evaluate the supply and adequacy of financing available for the development and rental of affordable housing and for the purchase of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations by persons of eligible income; and to identify the means and methods through which adequate sources of financing for such purposes may be developed and maintained;

(15) To plan, prepare, carry out, develop, construct, acquire, improve, reconstruct, renovate, rehabilitate, enlarge, reduce, alter, manage, own, lease, and operate housing, housing projects or developments, or any portions of housing projects or developments;

(16) To finance an agency's developments, operations, and other activities in such manner, utilizing such public or private source or sources of revenue, and employing such financing methods or techniques as the agency deems appropriate; to combine revenue derived from different sources, including equity investments and borrowings, in any combination and proportion as the agency deems appropriate; and to create and to enter into arrangements concerning mixed-finance developments;

(17) To maintain, repair, and replace all housing developments, any portions thereof, and any facilities and improvements contained therein or associated therewith;

(18) Subject only to the limitations contained in sections 71-15,122 to 71-15,129, to lease or rent any dwellings, facilities, or other real or personal property owned, controlled, or possessed by the agency, or with respect to which the agency has contractual rights permitting such lease or rental, for such terms, upon such conditions and lease terms, and in exchange for such rentals as the agency may from time to time in its discretion determine; to establish rents in such manner and in such amounts as the agency may deem appropriate, including, but not limited to, rents based upon family income, determined with such adjustments and exclusions as the agency deems appropriate, minimum rents, flat rents, graduated rents, rent ranges, and maximum rents, any of which may vary among the agency's developments; and to establish any other standards and conditions relating to rentals that the agency may deem appropriate;

(19) To acquire title, long-term and short-term leasehold interests, possessory rights, options upon, cooperative interests in, or any other interest in or relating to land, dwellings, facilities, or any other real or personal property by purchase, gift, grant, bequest, devise, lease, contract, or any other manner or arrangement; to acquire any such property or any interest therein through the exercise of the power of eminent domain as provided in subdivision (39) of this section; to take over or lease and manage any housing development or undertaking in which a local government or the state or federal government has an interest; and to transfer, donate, sell, lease, exchange, convey, assign, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or any interest therein to any person, organization, or entity, either public or private, nonprofit or for-profit; and in such regard:

(a) A local housing agency may sell or lease any real or personal property, or any interest therein, with or without public bidding, as the agency in its sole discretion may deem appropriate. Any acquisition or disposition of property or any interest therein may occur upon such terms and conditions and in exchange for such prices, or without consideration, as the agency shall deem appropriate, if such actions are taken in furtherance of the purposes of the act and subject to the limitations contained in sections 71-15,122 to 71-15,129; and

(b) At and subsequent to an acquisition of occupied property, a local housing agency may permit existing tenants therein to remain in occupancy upon such terms and conditions and for such periods as the agency shall deem appropriate, notwithstanding that such tenants do not qualify as persons of eligible income;

(20) To develop, acquire, own, lease, and operate properties and facilities that are nonresidential in character which are used (a) for the agency's office, administrative, management, or maintenance purposes or (b) for educational, governmental, or other public purposes by the agency or others;

(21) To develop, acquire, own, or lease community facilities and to provide such facilities to any public agency or to any person, agency, institution, or organization, public or private, for recreational, educational, health, or welfare purposes for the benefit and use of the local housing agency, for occupants of its dwelling accommodations, persons of eligible income, or elderly or handicapped persons, or for any combination of the persons listed in this subdivision, and which facilities may also serve the general public and the provision of such community facilities may be with or without charge therefor as in the local housing agency's discretion shall be deemed advisable to promote the public purposes of the act; to operate or manage community facilities itself, or as agent for any public agency, or for any person, institution, or organization, public or private; and to receive compensation therefor, if any, as the parties may agree;

(22) To carry out plans, programs, contracts, and agreements of every kind and description and to provide grants, guarantees, and other financial assistance to public or private persons or entities, whether nonprofit or for-profit, in order to rehabilitate, maintain, procure, and preserve existing affordable housing stocks in safe, decent, and sanitary condition and to ensure that they remain affordable to persons of eligible income; in connection therewith, to impose or agree to such terms and conditions concerning the term of affordability and other matters as the local housing agency shall deem appropriate;

(23) Subject to the limitations contained in sections 71-15,122 to 71-15,129, to establish and apply such criteria and requirements relating to eligibility for any assistance administered or provided by the agency as the agency shall from time to time determine to be necessary, appropriate, or desirable, including, without limitation, criteria and requirements relating to income, work, or employment, child care, education, job training, and personal or family self-sufficiency; in addition to establishing eligibility, to utilize such criteria and requirements for determining the amount and duration of any assistance to be provided to a beneficiary of such assistance; to establish such exclusions from income for purposes of determining eligibility as the agency shall deem appropriate; and to adopt and administer lawful preferences which may include preferences for working persons and families;

(24) To mortgage, encumber, pledge, convey by trust deed or deed to secure debt, assign, or otherwise grant or consent to a lien or other security interest in, any real or personal property, or any interest therein, owned or held by the agency or in which the agency may hold an interest. Any and all such actions may be taken to provide security for the repayment of borrowed funds, or to secure any guarantee of such repayment or any other performance by the agency, or to secure any payment, guarantee, or performance of any controlled affiliate of the agency in furtherance of the purposes of the act. Any such action shall be upon such terms and conditions as the agency shall in its discretion from time to time determine. The terms and conditions of any mortgage or other instrument granting or consenting to a security interest in property of a local housing agency may include any and all provisions that are deemed necessary by the agency. Such terms and conditions may, among other things, contain a power of sale or right of foreclosure in the event of nonpayment or other default thereunder. All actions taken by a local housing agency authorized in this section shall be consistent with the requirements of section 71-15,130 and shall comply with the requirements of section 71-15,129, where such requirements are applicable;

(25) Subject to the limitations contained in section 71-15,130:

(a) With respect to qualifying tenants:

(i) To make grants or subsidy payments to such persons;

(ii) To act as a guarantor, borrower, fiduciary, or partner in programs which provide financing to such persons;

(iii) To make loans for the purpose of assisting such persons to become homeowners or economically self-sufficient when such persons are not otherwise qualified, or need such assistance to become qualified, to borrow from private financial institutions;

(iv) To purchase loans made in connection with or encumbering housing for such persons; and

(v) To engage in mortgage rate buy-downs to enhance the availability of mortgage financing that is affordable to qualifying tenants;

(b) To make loans, including acquisition, development, construction, and rehabilitation loans, long-term mortgage loans, and guarantees, to or for the benefit of (i) affiliates of the housing agency or (ii) persons, firms, partnerships, associations, joint ventures, or corporations, public or private, whether nonprofit or for-profit, in conjunction with loans provided by private financial institutions, for purposes of developing and constructing housing for persons of eligible income, and for mixed-income housing developments;

(c) For the benefit of qualifying tenants, to enter into and perform contracts, agreements, and arrangements of every kind and description with banks, thrift institutions, credit unions, mortgage bankers, and other lenders to enhance the supply of:

(i) Mortgage financing affordable to such persons; and

(ii) Financing for the production of rental and fee-ownership housing for occupancy for such persons;

(d) To enter into commitments relating to any action authorized under this subdivision;

(e) To charge such fees and impose such repayment terms and other terms and conditions concerning loans, mortgages, guarantees, mortgage subsidies, and other forms of assistance provided by the agency as the agency shall from time to time determine to be necessary or appropriate;

(f) To not lend its credit or otherwise act as a guarantor or surety for the indebtedness or performance of any other person or entity, other than its own controlled affiliates and any other public body of this state, unless the housing agency creates a special limited fund for such purpose as provided in section 71-15,131; and

(g) To not make loans directly, or indirectly through a controlled affiliate, except as provided in subdivision (25) of this section;

(26) To forgive, compromise, or forebear from collecting or enforcing, wholly, partially, temporarily, or permanently, any debt or obligation owed to the local housing agency;

(27) To develop, acquire, own, hold, lease, rent, and operate mixed-income developments, subject to the limitations contained in section 71-15,124;

(28) To administer rental and relocation assistance programs of every kind and description on its own behalf or for others within its area of operation and, to the extent such agency determines such administration to be feasible, in any area elsewhere in this state (a) with respect to which a local housing agency has not been established or (b) with the consent of any local housing agency established to serve the area in which such assistance would be administered; and in connection with the administration of such assistance, to make payments relating to relocations and rent subsidy payments to persons of eligible income or to others, including landlords, on behalf of persons of eligible income. Rental assistance programs administered by a local housing agency may be tenant-based, in which event the assistance is provided to or for the benefit of the tenant, or such programs may be development-based, in which event the assistance is connected to particular real property;

(29) To purchase and maintain in force bonds and insurance of such types and for such purposes as the agency deems appropriate; to pay premiums and charges for all bonds and policies of insurance purchased by the agency, which bonds and policies of insurance benefiting or insuring the agency shall be in such amounts, contain such terms and conditions, provide for such deductibles, be in such form, and be issued by such companies as the agency shall deem appropriate; and to self-insure and to form and participate in consortia, insurance pools, and other organizations owned or operated by housing agencies for the purpose of insuring such agencies, which consortia, pools, or organizations may include units of government or public agencies other than housing agencies. An agency may purchase and maintain insurance covering the liability of any commissioner, officer, employee, or agent of the agency arising in connection with the agency's business or affairs;

(30) To indemnify any commissioner, officer, or employee of the agency as provided in sections 71-15,143 and 71-15,144;

(31) To provide directly or to contract for, arrange, or cooperate with any person or entity, public or private, including any other public agency, and to utilize its property to provide services or make financial or other contributions of every kind and description to enhance the social and economic well-being of residents of the agency's housing developments and other persons of eligible income; to create and operate accounts for the benefit of persons and families participating in activities and programs for the enhancement of individual and family economic self-sufficiency; and to award scholarships and to conduct or make provision for educational and training programs of every kind and description. Except as otherwise provided in the act, the agency may establish and collect fees or seek reimbursement of costs in connection with the delivery of programs and services;

(32) To borrow money or accept grants and other forms of assistance, financial and otherwise, from the local, state, or federal government in connection with any activity or program furthering the purposes of the act; to take all actions necessary to agree to and fully comply with all requirements and conditions of any state or federal program, grant, loan, or program providing services or assistance to the agency, its programs, its properties and housing developments, and the residents of such housing developments; and to perform all responsibilities and obligations of the agency under any contract or agreement with state or federal authorities and imposed by applicable state or federal law and regulation with respect to such state or federal assistance. Without limiting such provisions, a housing agency may:

(a) Take over, lease, or manage any development or undertaking constructed or owned by the state, or any public agency thereof, or the federal government;

(b) Participate in any plan or program of the state, or any public agency thereof, or the federal government, which provides revenue that may be used for carrying out the purposes of the act, including without limitation any program involving the issuance of bonds, special fees or taxes, or tax credits;

(c) Operate and administer any program providing rental assistance for itself or on behalf of others; and

(d) Comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases, agreements, or arrangements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of this subdivision.

It is the purpose and intent of the act to authorize every housing agency to do all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the state and federal governments and their public agencies in the development, maintenance, operation, or disposition of any housing development or other activity undertaken by such housing agency to carry out the purposes of the act;

(33) To borrow money and accept grants and other forms of assistance, financial and otherwise, from private persons or entities in furtherance of the purposes of the act; except as otherwise provided under the act, to agree to and comply with all otherwise lawful requirements and conditions attached to the provision of such assistance; to enter into contracts and agreements of every kind and description with private persons and entities, nonprofit or for-profit, to acquire, create, manage, or operate housing developments including, without limitation, mixed-income developments and housing developments benefiting qualifying tenants, to supply services to the residents of such developments, and otherwise to engage in activities furthering the purposes of the act; and to undertake and perform all responsibilities and obligations of the agency under such arrangements as the agency determines to be necessary or desirable in connection therewith, if the same is not expressly prohibited by the provisions of the act;

(34) To operate and manage housing developments owned or controlled by other housing agencies or public agencies, or other persons or entities, whether private or public and whether nonprofit or for-profit, if the agency determines that such action will further the purposes of the act; to permit and provide for the operation or management of any development in which the agency holds an interest by a person or entity other than the agency, whether public or private and whether nonprofit or for-profit; to administer any program of, or provide services or assistance on behalf of, another housing agency or other public agency; to permit and provide for the management or administration of any of the agency's programs, assistance, or services by another housing agency or other public agency, or by any other person or entity, whether public or private and whether nonprofit or for-profit; and to enter into and perform contracts and agreements relating to any such management or administration upon such terms and conditions and in exchange for such compensation, if any, as the agency deems appropriate;

(35) To construct and operate facilities and programs and to provide services of every kind and description, directly or by contract or agreement with others, for the maintenance of safety and security and the protection of persons and property at or near the agency's developments; and to make, impose, and enforce rules and regulations for such purposes;

(36) To assist in the formation and operation of resident organizations, including resident councils, resident management corporations, and other nonprofit entities controlled and operated by residents of the agency's developments; to donate or loan money to such resident organizations in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as the agency deems appropriate; to enter into and perform contracts, agreements, and arrangements with resident organizations for the management of housing developments and other facilities and properties and for the administration of programs, assistance, or services, and for other activities, all with respect to such matters and upon such terms and conditions as the agency may from time to time deem appropriate; and to enter into partnerships, joint ventures, associations, or other arrangements with resident organizations in furtherance of the purposes of the act. Such activities may include the formation and operation of business enterprises that provide employment and other benefits to residents of the agency's housing developments and others as elsewhere permitted under the act;

(37) To develop, acquire, own, renovate, lease, and operate facilities specifically intended to house and otherwise assist homeless persons, including, without limitation, shelters and transitional housing; and to provide other assistance and services to homeless persons. Such housing and other assistance may be provided in such manner, upon such conditions, and for such duration as the local housing agency shall deem appropriate;

(38) By itself or in cooperation with others, including participation in a group or groups, to form, administer, operate, and purchase funds or plans, including, but not limited to, health care, health insurance, retirement or pension, and other plans for the benefit of employees of the local housing agency and their families;

(39) To acquire real property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain in accordance with Chapter 76, article 7. Such power shall only be exercised by the public housing agency and not any affiliate thereof, and property acquired by the exercise of eminent domain shall be used solely for the purpose of providing housing which is wholly owned by the agency or its wholly owned controlled affiliates. Public property may be so acquired only with the consent of the public agency which owns such property. An agency may acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain notwithstanding that, subsequent to such acquisition but not sooner than five years thereafter, the agency may, if it determines such action to be in furtherance of the purposes of the act, convey the property so acquired, or any interest therein, to others, including private nonprofit or for-profit entities;

(40) To expend public funds in any manner related to the exercise of the powers granted to a housing agency under the act and otherwise existing under other applicable law;

(41) To join and participate in organizations and associations and to pay the costs, fees, and dues necessary to initiate and maintain such memberships and to participate in the activities of such organizations or associations;

(42) To grant, donate, or contribute funds, property, or services to others and to enter into arrangements involving the same in such manner and amount as the agency may deem appropriate if the agency determines that such action will benefit residents or other persons of eligible income or will otherwise further the purposes of the act. A housing agency may not make any grant, donation, or contribution to any candidate for political office, any campaign committee or other organization advocating the election of a political candidate, or any political action committee or other organization whose principal activity involves political action or advocacy; and

(43) To establish special or limited funds or reserves as security for or to facilitate or implement any of the powers specified in the act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 42.